Maryland, session 2025, SB0851.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0851*

SENATE BILL 851
7–136.
ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2025, AND EACH SEPTEMBER 1 THEREAFTER,
EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE AND REPORT, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE NUMBER OF MAIN ENTRANCES TO PUBLIC SCHOOL
BUILDINGS IN THE COUNTY THAT ARE NOT ACCESSIBLE FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH
DISABILITIES AND NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE FEDERAL AMERICANS WITH
DISABILITIES ACT.
7–435.
(a) On or before December 1, 2017, the Department shall, in consultation with
disability advocacy groups, update the Emergency Planning Guidelines for Local School
Systems and Schools to accommodate, safeguard, and evacuate students, staff, and visitors
with disabilities on public school grounds in accordance with the federal Americans with
Disabilities Act.
(b) (1) On or before July 1, 2018, each local school system shall update the local
school system’s emergency plan to comply with the update of the Department’s guidelines
and regulations under subsection (a) of this section.
(2) (I) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2025, AND EACH
SEPTEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL SEND A COPY OF
THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM’S EMERGENCY PLAN TO THE DEPARTMENT.
(II) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025, AND EACH DECEMBER
1 THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
1. ANALYZE THE EMERGENCY PLANS RECEIVED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
2. REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON WHETHER
EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE DEPARTMENT’S
GUIDELINES AND REGULATIONS UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) If a student with an IEP requires specific accommodations for evacuation in
an emergency, the student’s IEP shall include accommodations for the student during an
emergency.
(d) If a student with a 504 plan requires specific accommodations for evacuation
in an emergency, the student’s 504 team shall discuss and address the student’s needs as
necessary.

SENATE BILL 851 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.